Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5469.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "virtual currency kiosk consumer protection act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Blockchain" means a distributed digital ledger or database that is chronological, consensus-based, decentralized, and mathematically verified in nature. (b) "Blockchain analytics" means a software service that uses data from various virtual currencies and applicable blockchains to provide a risk rating specific to a virtual wallet address from a user of a virtual currency kiosk. (c) "Department" means the department of insurance and financial services. (d) "Federal deposit insurance corporation or securities investor protection corporation" means a bank, credit union, savings and loan association, trust company, savings association, savings bank, industrial bank, or industrial loan company organized under the laws of the United States or any state of the United States, if the bank, credit union, savings and loan association, trust company, savings association, savings bank, industrial bank, or industrial loan company has federally insured deposits. (e) "Fiat currency" means a medium of exchange that is authorized or adopted by the United States government as part of the government's currency and is not backed by a commodity. (f) "NMLS" means the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry developed by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators and operated by the State Regulatory Registry, LLC, or any successor or affiliated entity, for the licensing and registration of a person in the financial services industry. (g) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (h) "Virtual currency" means, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (i), any type of digital unit that is used as a medium of exchange, as a form of digitally stored value, or that is incorporated into payment system technology. Virtual currency includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (i) A digital unit of exchange that has a centralized repository or administrator. (ii) A digital unit of exchange that is decentralized and has no centralized repository or administrator. (iii) A digital unit of exchange that may be created or obtained by computing or manufacturing effort. (i) Virtual currency does not include either of the following: (i) A digital unit of exchange that is used solely within an online gaming platform with no market or application outside of the gaming platform. (ii) A digital unit of exchange that is used exclusively as part of a consumer affinity or rewards program, and can be applied solely as payment for a purchase with the issuer or other designated merchant but cannot be converted into or redeemed for fiat currency. (j) "Virtual currency kiosk" means an electronic terminal that enables a virtual currency kiosk operator to facilitate the exchange of fiat currency for virtual currency or of virtual currency for fiat currency or other virtual currency by doing either of the following: (i) Connecting directly to a separate virtual currency exchange that performs the actual virtual currency transmission. (ii) Drawing on the virtual currency in the possession of the operator of the electronic terminal. (k) "Virtual currency kiosk operator" or "operator" means a person that operates a virtual currency kiosk in this state. (l) "Virtual currency kiosk transaction" or "transaction" means a transaction conducted or performed, in whole or in part, by electronic means via a virtual currency kiosk. (m) "Virtual wallet" means a hardware or software application that enables an individual to store and use virtual currency. (n) "Virtual wallet address" means an alphanumeric identifier representing a destination on a blockchain for a virtual currency transfer that is associated with a virtual wallet. Sec. 5. Before entering an initial transaction for, on behalf of, or with an individual, a virtual currency kiosk operator shall disclose in a clear, conspicuous, and legible manner all material risks associated with the operator's products, services, and activities and virtual currency generally, including all of the following information: (a) Virtual currency is not legal tender, is not backed by the United States government, and accounts and value balances are not subject to protections that are received by a federal deposit insurance corporation or securities investor protection corporation. (b) Legislative and regulatory changes or actions at the state, federal, or international level may adversely affect the use, transfer, exchange, and value of virtual currency. (c) Transactions in virtual currency may be irreversible and losses due to fraudulent or accidental transactions may not be recoverable. (d) Some virtual currency kiosk transactions are considered made when recorded on a public ledger, which may not be the date or time the individual initiates the transaction. (e) The value of virtual currency may be derived from the continued willingness of market participants to exchange fiat currency for virtual currency, which may result in the permanent and total loss of a particular virtual currency's value if the market for the virtual currency disappears. (f) A person that accepts virtual currency as payment today is not required to accept virtual currency as payment in the future. (g) The volatility and unpredictability of the price of virtual currency relative to fiat currency may result in significant loss over a short period of time. (h) The nature of virtual currency may lead to an increased risk of fraud or cyber-attack. (i) The nature of virtual currency means that any technological difficulties experienced by the virtual currency kiosk operator may prevent the access to or use of an individual's virtual currency. (j) Any bond or trust account maintained by the virtual currency kiosk operator for the benefit of an individual may not cover all losses an individual incurs. Sec. 7. Before entering an initial transaction for, on behalf of, or with an individual, a virtual currency kiosk operator shall disclose in a clear, conspicuous, and legible manner all relevant terms and conditions associated with the operator's products, services, and activities and virtual currency generally, including all of the following: (a) The individual's liability for an unauthorized virtual currency kiosk transaction. (b) The circumstances in which the virtual currency kiosk operator will disclose an individual's account information to a third party without a court or government order. (c) The individual's right to receive periodic account statements and valuations from the virtual currency kiosk operator. (d) The individual's right to receive a receipt, trade ticket, or other evidence of a virtual currency kiosk transaction. (e) The customer's right to prior notice of a change in the virtual currency kiosk operator's rules or policies. (f) Any other disclosures customarily provided when an individual opens a registration account. Sec. 9. Before entering any transaction for, on behalf of, or with an individual, a virtual currency kiosk operator shall disclose a warning to the individual that includes the following statement: "Customer Notice. Please Read Carefully. Did you receive a phone call from your bank, software provider, the police, or were you directed to make a payment for social security, utility bill, investment, warrants, or bail money at this kiosk? STOP Is anyone on the phone pressuring you to make a payment of any kind? STOP I understand that the purchase and sale of cryptocurrency is a final irreversible and non-refundable transaction. I confirm I am sending funds to a wallet I own or directly have control over. I confirm that I am using funds gained from my own initiative to make my transaction." Sec. 11. After completing a virtual currency kiosk transaction, a virtual currency kiosk operator shall provide the individual using the virtual currency kiosk a physical receipt, or a virtual receipt sent to the individual's telephone number, that contains all of the following information: (a) The virtual currency kiosk operator's name and contact information, including a telephone number to answer questions and register complaints. (b) The type, value, date, and precise time of the transaction in the local time zone. (c) The fee charged. (d) The exchange rate. (e) A statement of the virtual currency kiosk operator's liability for nondelivery or delayed delivery. (f) A statement of the virtual currency kiosk operator's refund policy. Sec. 13. (1) A virtual currency kiosk operator shall use blockchain analytics to assist the operator in preventing purchased virtual currency from being sent to a virtual wallet that is known to be affiliated with fraudulent activity at the time of a virtual currency kiosk transaction. (2) The department may request from a virtual currency kiosk operator evidence of the operator's current use of blockchain analytics. Sec. 15. A virtual currency kiosk operator shall provide live, toll-free customer service by telephone Monday through Friday between 8 a.m. and 10 p.m., at a minimum. A virtual currency kiosk operator must display the customer service toll-free telephone number on the exterior of the virtual currency kiosk or on the screen of the virtual currency kiosk. Sec. 17. (1) A virtual currency kiosk operator shall take reasonable steps to detect and prevent fraud, including establishing and maintaining a written antifraud policy. (2) A written antifraud policy under subsection (1) must, at a minimum, include all of the following: (a) The identification and assessment of fraud related risk areas. (b) Procedures and controls to protect against identified risks. (c) Allocation of responsibility for monitoring risks. (d) Procedures for the periodic evaluation and revision of the antifraud procedures, controls, and monitoring mechanisms. (3) A virtual currency kiosk operator shall maintain, implement, and enforce both of the following: (a) A written enhanced due diligence policy that identifies, at a minimum, any individuals who are at risk of fraud based on the age or mental capacity of the individual. (b) Written compliance policies and procedures. (4) Each policy and procedure under subsection (3) must be reviewed and approved by the virtual currency kiosk operator's board of directors or an equivalent governing body of the virtual currency kiosk operator. Sec. 19. (1) A virtual currency kiosk operator shall designate a compliance officer. All of the following apply to the individual designated as a compliance officer: (a) The individual must be qualified to coordinate and monitor compliance with this act and all other applicable laws, rules, and regulations. (b) The individual must be employed full-time by the virtual currency kiosk operator. (c) The individual must not own more than 20% of the virtual currency kiosk operator that is employing the compliance officer. (2) Only full-time employees of the virtual currency kiosk operator shall complete compliance responsibilities required under federal and state laws, rules, and regulations. (3) A virtual currency kiosk operator shall designate a consumer protection officer. All of the following apply to the individual designated as a consumer protection officer: (a) The individual must be qualified to coordinate and monitor compliance with this act and all other applicable laws, rules, and regulations. (b) The individual must be employed full-time by the virtual currency kiosk operator. (c) The individual must not own more than 20% of the virtual currency kiosk operator that is employing the consumer protection officer. Sec. 21. (1) Not more than 45 days after the end of the calendar quarter, a virtual currency kiosk operator shall submit a report that includes the location of each of the operator's virtual currency kiosks in this state. The department shall formulate a system for a virtual currency kiosk operator to submit a report required under this subsection. (2) A report under subsection (1) must include, at a minimum, all of the following information: (a) The legal name of the operator. (b) Any fictitious or trade names of the operator. (c) The physical address of each virtual currency kiosk. (d) The start date of the operation of each virtual currency kiosk at the location. (e) If applicable, the end date of the operation of each virtual currency kiosk at each location. Sec. 22. A county, city, township, or village shall not enact or enforce an ordinance that restricts the use of a virtual currency kiosk in this state. Sec. 23. (1) The department may request evidence that demonstrates a virtual currency kiosk operator's compliance with this act as reasonably necessary or appropriate to administer and enforce this act. (2) A virtual currency kiosk operator shall provide the department with all records the department may reasonably require and request under subsection (1). (3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4), any information, evidence, or report obtained by the department from a virtual currency kiosk operator under this act, or any information contained in or related to a report prepared by, on behalf of, or for the use of the department under this act, is confidential and is not subject to disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (4) All of the following information is not confidential and must be made available to the public on the department's website, on receipt by the department of a written request, or in NMLS: (a) The name, business address, telephone number, and unique identifier of a virtual currency kiosk operator. (b) The business address of a virtual currency kiosk operator's registered agent for service. (c) Any copies of a final order of the department relating to a violation of this act. Sec. 25. A virtual currency kiosk operator that knowingly and willfully violates this act is subject to a civil fine of not more than $1,000.00 for each violation.